Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2175.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART VICONSUMER PROTECTIONChapter71. Artificial Intelligence and ChatbotsCHAPTER 71ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND CHATBOTSSec.7101. Scope of chapter.7102. Definitions.123456789101112131415161718 7103. Protection of personal information.7104. Advertising.7105. Disclosure of artificial intelligence technology.7106. Enforcement and penalties.7107. Construction.§ 7101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to artificial intelligence and chatbots.§ 7102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3131(g) (relating to unlawful dissemination of intimate image)."Artificial intelligence technology." A computer system, application or other product that uses or incorporates one or more forms of artificial intelligence."Bureau." The Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of Attorney General."Chatbot." As follows:(1) Artificial intelligence technology that:(i) Uses generative artificial intelligence to engage in interactive conversations with a consumer.(ii) A supplier represents, or a reasonable person would believe, can or will provide information to a consumer to help a consumer manage a situation or treat a condition, including a situation or treatment involving mental health care.(2) The term does not include artificial intelligence technology that only:(i) provides scripted output, including a guided 20260HB2175PN2831 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meditation or mindfulness exercise; or(ii) analyzes an individual's input for the purpose of connecting the individual with a human mental health professional."Consumer." An individual located in this Commonwealth at the time that the individual accesses or uses a chatbot."Consumer input." Content provided to a chatbot by a consumer."Covered entity." As defined in 45 CFR 160.103 (relating to definitions)."Generative artificial intelligence." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3131(g)."Health care provider." As follows:(1) A person, corporation, facility, institution or other entity licensed, certified or approved by the Commonwealth to provide health care or professional medical services.(2) The term includes a physician, chiropractor, optometrist, professional nurse, certified nurse-midwife, podiatrist, hospital, nursing home, ambulatory surgical center and birth center."Health plan." As defined in 45 CFR 160.103."Individually identifiable health information." Information, whether oral or recorded in any form or medium, that relates to the physical or mental health or condition of an individual."Mental health care." Any care, treatment, service or procedure to maintain, diagnose, treat or provide for mental health, including any medication program and therapeutic treatment."Mental health professional." As follows:20260HB2175PN2831 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth to administer or provide mental health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.(2) The term includes:(i) Any of the following, as defined in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985:(A) A physician.(B) A physician assistant.(ii) An advance practice professional as defined in section 2 of the act of May 31, 2018 (P.L.123, No.25), known as the Outpatient Psychiatric Oversight Act.(iii) An individual licensed as a psychologist in accordance with the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act.(iv) Any of the following, as defined in section 2 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law:(A) A certified registered nurse practitioner.(B) A clinical nurse specialist.(v) Any of the following, as defined in section 3 of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act:(A) A licensed associate marriage and family therapist.(B) A licensed associate professional counselor.(C) A licensed bachelor social worker.20260HB2175PN2831 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) A licensed clinical social worker.(E) A licensed marriage and family therapist.(F) A licensed professional counselor.(G) A licensed social worker.(H) A social worker.(vi) An addictions counselor who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to staff drug and alcohol treatment projects and provide services regarding substance abuse and recovery, in accordance with 28 Pa. Code Pt. V (relating to Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs) and the laws of this Commonwealth."Operator." An individual or entity, including a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, estate, foundation, association, organization or trust, or an agent or subsidiary thereof, that offers the use of or provides a chatbot to a consumer, if the chatbot is bought from or otherwise provided by a supplier."Supplier." As follows:(1) A seller, lessor, assignor, offeror, broker or other person that regularly solicits, engages in or enforces transactions with a consumer regarding a chatbot, whether or not the person deals directly with the consumer.(2) The term includes an operator.§ 7103. Protection of personal information.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided under subsections (b) and (c), a supplier may not sell to or share with a third party the following:(1) Individually identifiable health information of a consumer.(2) Consumer input.20260HB2175PN2831 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Applicability.--The prohibition under subsection (a) shall not apply if:(1) Either:(i) A health care provider requests access to the individually identifiable health information of the consumer and the consumer consents to the access in accordance with subsection (d).(ii) The consumer requests that a health plan be provided access to the individually identifiable health information of the consumer and the consumer consents to the access in accordance with subsection (d).(2) The individually identifiable health information is shared in accordance with subsection (c).(c) Sharing information.--(1) A supplier may share a consumer's individually identifiable health information if:(i) the sharing of the information is necessary to ensure the effective functionality of the chatbot with a third party with which the supplier has a contract related to the functionality; and(ii) the consumer consents to the sharing of the information in accordance with subsection (d).(2) When sharing information in accordance with this subsection, the supplier and the third party shall comply with all applicable privacy and security provisions of 45 CFR Pts. 160 (relating to general administrative requirements) and 164 (relating to security and privacy), as if the supplier were a covered entity and the third party were a business associate.(d) Consent.--20260HB2175PN2831 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A consumer may consent to access to individually identifiable health information of the consumer by a health care provider or health plan in accordance with this section.(2) To be effective, the consent under this subsection must:(i) Be in writing.(ii) Acknowledge that the consumer understands and agrees to the access of the individually identifiable health information of the consumer by a health care provider or health plan.(3) The consent under this subsection may involve the consumer initialing or signing the acknowledgment described in paragraph (2)(ii), checking a box, providing an electronic signature or hitting a button.§ 7104. Advertising.(a) Supplier.--A supplier may not:(1) Use a chatbot to advertise a specific product or service to a consumer in a conversation between the consumer and the chatbot.(2) Use consumer input to:(i) Determine whether to display an advertisement for a product or service to the consumer, unless the advertisement is for the chatbot itself.(ii) Determine a product, service or category of product or service to advertise to the consumer.(iii) Customize how an advertisement is presented to the consumer.(b) Construction.--This section shall not be construed to prohibit a chatbot from recommending a consumer to seek counseling, therapy or other assistance from a mental health 20260HB2175PN2831 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional.§ 7105. Disclosure of artificial intelligence technology.(a) Policy required.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), a supplier of a chatbot shall develop, implement and maintain a written policy containing disclosures regarding the chatbot in accordance with subsection (c).(2) In complying with paragraph (1), a supplier shall protect any trade secret or other proprietary information regarding the chatbot.(b) Consent required.--(1) Before accessing the features of a chatbot or entering the chat page of a chatbot, a consumer must acknowledge that the consumer has read, understands and consents to the policy described under subsection (a) and the purpose, capabilities and limitations of the chatbot.(2) The consent under this subsection must be in writing and may involve the consumer initialing or signing the acknowledgment described in paragraph (1), checking a box, providing an electronic signature or hitting a button.(c) Specific disclosures.--The policy described under subsection (a) must clearly and conspicuously provide the following:(1) The intended purposes of the chatbot.(2) The abilities and limitations of the chatbot.(3) A statement that the chatbot is an artificial intelligence technology and is not a human, which must be provided each time that the consumer asks or otherwise prompts the chatbot about whether artificial intelligence is being used.20260HB2175PN2831 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The procedures by which the supplier:(i) Conducts testing, prior to making the chatbot publicly available and regularly thereafter, to ensure that the output of the chatbot poses no greater risk to a consumer than that posed to an individual communicating with a human.(ii) Identifies reasonably foreseeable adverse outcomes to, and potentially harmful interactions with, consumers that could result from using the chatbot.(iii) Provides a mechanism for a consumer to report any potentially harmful interactions from the use of the chatbot.(iv) Implements protocols to assess and respond to risk of harm to consumers or other individuals.(v) Details actions taken to prevent or mitigate any adverse outcomes or potentially harmful interactions.(vi) Implements protocols to respond, as soon as practicable, to acute risks of physical harm.(vii) Reasonably ensures regular, objective reviews of safety, accuracy and efficacy, which may include internal or external audits.(viii) Provides consumers with instructions on the safe use of the chatbot.(ix) Prioritizes consumer mental health and safety over engagement metrics or profit.(x) Implements measures to prevent discriminatory treatment of consumers.(xi) Ensures compliance with the security and privacy provisions of 45 CFR Pts. 160 (relating to general administrative requirements) and 164 (relating to 20260HB2175PN2831 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security and privacy), as if the supplier were a covered entity.(d) Documentation.--A supplier shall maintain documentation regarding the development and implementation of the chatbot that describes:(1) Foundation models used in development.(2) Training data used.(3) Compliance with Federal and State privacy law.(4) Consumer data collection and sharing practices.(5) Ongoing efforts to ensure accuracy, reliability, fairness and safety.(e) Filing.--A supplier shall file the policy described under subsection (a) with the bureau, in the form and manner as prescribed by the bureau, along with:(1) The name and address of the supplier.(2) The name of the chatbot.(3) An annual filing fee as prescribed by the bureau.(f) Additional information.--A supplier may provide to the bureau, in the form and manner prescribed by the bureau:(1) Any revision to the policy described under subsection (a) and filed in accordance with subsection (e).(2) Any other documentation that the supplier deems appropriate to provide.(g) Compliance.--A supplier shall comply with the requirements of the policy filed in accordance with this section.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Trade secret." As defined in section 5302 (relating to 20260HB2175PN2831 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definitions).§ 7106. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Administration and enforcement generally.--The bureau shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.(b) Actions by bureau.--In enforcing this chapter, the bureau may:(1) Impose on a supplier an administrative fine not to exceed $2,500 for each act or omission that constitutes a violation of this chapter by the supplier.(2) Bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction against a supplier whose act or omission constitutes a violation of this chapter.(c) Court authority.--(1) In an action brought by the bureau to enforce this chapter, the court may:(i) Declare that an act or practice violates a provision of this chapter.(ii) Grant injunctive relief.(iii) Order the disgorgement of money received in violation of this chapter.(iv) Order the payment of disgorged money to a consumer or other person injured as a result of a violation of this chapter.(v) Impose a fine not to exceed $2,500 for each act or omission that constitutes a violation of this chapter.(vi) Award other relief as the court deems reasonable and necessary.(2) If the court awards judgment or injunctive relief to the bureau, the court shall award the bureau:(i) Reasonable attorney fees.20260HB2175PN2831 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Court costs.(iii) Investigative fees.(3) The court may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each violation of an administrative or court order issued for a violation of this chapter.(d) Attorney General.--The Attorney General may bring a civil action on behalf of the bureau to collect a fine or civil penalty imposed under this section.(e) Deposit.--The bureau shall deposit all fines and civil penalties collected under this section into the fund designated for the receipt of money relating to the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline.(f) Private right of action.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any other remedy available at law.§ 7107. Construction.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:(1) Bar or otherwise restrict the bureau from bringing an enforcement action in accordance with other State law against a supplier.(2) Claim, imply, advertise or otherwise recognize that a chatbot is, or replaces services rendered by, a mental health professional or emotional support professional.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2175PN2831 - 12 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223